Wisconsin, session 2025, SB728.
do enact as follows:SB728,11Section 1. 302.074 of the statutes is created to read:SB728,2,62302.074 Menstrual products for inmates of state correctional 3institutions and county jails or houses of correction. (1) In this section, 4“nontoxic” means free from carcinogens, phthalates, heavy metals, dioxins, 5pesticides, perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances, volatile organic 6compounds, and other toxic additives that are detrimental to human health.SB728,2,107(2) The department, in consultation with medical and other subject matter 8experts, shall develop procedures to verify menstrual products as nontoxic and 9publish a list of menstrual products that have been verified as nontoxic for use by 10state correctional institution staff and county sheriffs.SB728,2,1311(3) (a) The department shall ensure that each state correctional institution 12provides all of the following menstrual products free of charge to any inmate with 13an active menstrual cycle:SB728,2,16141. At least 3 brands of nontoxic tampons from the list published under sub. (2), 15with at least one brand having a plastic applicator, in appropriate absorbencies for 16varying levels of menstrual flow.SB728,2,18172. At least 3 brands of nontoxic menstrual pads from the list published under 18sub. (2), in appropriate absorbencies for varying levels of menstrual flow.SB728,3,213. At least one brand of nontoxic reusable menstrual cup from the list 2published under sub. (2).SB728,3,43(b) The department shall ensure that each state correctional institution has 4the means to sanitize inmate menstrual cups on an as-needed basis.SB728,3,75(4) (a) The sheriff shall ensure that each county jail or house of correction 6provides all of the following menstrual products free of charge to any inmate with 7an active menstrual cycle:SB728,3,1081. At least 3 brands of nontoxic tampons from the list published under sub. (2), 9with at least one brand having a plastic applicator, in appropriate absorbencies for 10varying levels of menstrual flow.SB728,3,12112. At least 3 brands of nontoxic menstrual pads from the list published under 12sub. (2), in appropriate absorbencies for varying levels of menstrual flow.SB728,3,14133. At least one brand of nontoxic reusable menstrual cup from the list 14published under sub. (2).SB728,3,1615(b) The sheriff shall ensure that each county jail or house of correction has the 16means to sanitize inmate menstrual cups on an as-needed basis.SB728,3,1717